Oklahoma, session 2026, SB613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-6-121 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish a


centralized statewide hotline for the reporting of water quality


concerns. The Office shall coordinate with the Department of


Environmental Quality to investigate complaints and conduct any


water quality sampling, testing, and enforcement measures deemed


necessary.


B. The Office of the Attorney General may promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1088 RD 1/19/2025 5:40:04 AM

Req. No. 1088 Page 1